Hawaii, session 2026, SB2503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's gun buyback program offers residents a safe way to dispose of unwanted or unlawful firearms, including automatic firearms, semi-automatic rifles, and unregistered "ghost guns".  The program offers participants up to $200 in Foodland Farms gift cards in exchange for each firearm and allows the firearm owner to remain anonymous.  The program's goal is to allow law enforcement officers to properly dispose of the weapons and to reduce the number of firearms in the State that could be used for criminal activities.  In April 2025, a gun buyback event on the island of Oahu collected an estimated three hundred sixty-seven firearms of all types, in exchange for $37,900 in Foodland Farms gift cards, distributed by the department of law enforcement.  In August 2025, the Honolulu police department, in partnership with the department of law enforcement, collected eighty-three firearms, including five unregistered ghost guns and eleven replica guns, and distributed seventy-nine gift cards valued at $100 each.  The program also offers free gun locks to help support the safe storage of guns in the home.  The legislature believes that the gun buyback program helps reduce firearms-related assaults and suicides, and gun-related accidents involving children. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys to the department of law enforcement for the State's gun buyback program, including at least two gun buyback events in each county. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the State's gun buyback program, including at least two gun buyback events in each county. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request